Utah statutes.
35A-8-508.   Annual accounting.

(1)  The executive director shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants and loans issued under this part on a yearly basis to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions imposed on the recipient by the executive director with the approval of the board or by this part.

(2) An entity that receives a grant or loan under this part shall provide the executive director with an annual accounting of how the money the entity received from the fund has been spent.

(3)  The executive director shall make an annual report to the board accounting for the expenditures authorized by the board.

(4)  The board shall submit an annual written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee before November 1:

(a)  accounting for expenditures authorized by the board; and

(b)  evaluating the effectiveness of the program.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 246, 2012 General Session

